zh-TW: 警車改裝等級: 原廠警用套件 (追捕級); 警犬部隊改裝; 有標誌巡邏車改裝; 囚犯運送改裝; 特警/戰術改裝; 搜救改裝; 主管/指揮車改裝; 交通執法改裝; 臥底改裝 (僅電子設備); 無標誌/無外部標記改裝; 多用途/現場支援改裝; 野生動物/公園巡守員風格改裝; 其他
sk-SK: Úroveň prispôsobeného vybavenia policajného vozidla: Továrenský policajný balík (na stíhanie); Úprava pre jednotku K-9; Úprava na označené hliadky; Úprava na transport väzňov; Úprava SWAT / taktická; Úprava na pátranie a záchranu; Úprava pre dozorcov / velenie; Úprava na kontrolu dopravy; Len utajená elektronika; Neoznačené / bez vonkajších označení; Úprava pre úžitkové / podporné zásahy; Úprava v štýle lesnej / strážnej služby; Iné
ko: 경찰차 개조 수준: 순정 경찰차 패키지(추격용); K-9 유닛 개조; 마킹 순찰차 개조; 수감자 이송용 개조; SWAT/전술 차량 개조; 수색 및 구조 개조; 관리자/지휘 차량 개조; 교통 단속 개조; 위장 잠입(전자 장비 전용); 언마킹/외부 마킹 없음; 다목적/현장 지원 개조; 야생동물/공원 관리원 스타일 개조; 기타
el: Επίπεδο εξοπλισμού αστυνομικού οχήματος: Εργοστασιακό αστυνομικό πακέτο (καταδίωξης); Διαμόρφωση μονάδας K-9; Διαμόρφωση περιπολικού με σήματα; Διαμόρφωση μεταφοράς κρατουμένων; Διαμόρφωση SWAT / τακτικών επιχειρήσεων; Διαμόρφωση έρευνας και διάσωσης; Διαμόρφωση επόπτη / διοίκησης; Διαμόρφωση ελέγχου τροχαίας; Μυστικής δράσης (μόνο ηλεκτρονικά); Συμβατικό όχημα / χωρίς εξωτερικά σήματα; Διαμόρφωση οχήματος πολλαπλών χρήσεων / υποστήριξης; Διαμόρφωση θηροφυλακής / δασοφυλακής; Άλλο
bg-BG: Ниво на оборудване на полицейския автомобил: Фабрично полицейско оборудване (за преследване); Модификация за кинологично звено; Модификация за маркиран патрул; Модификация за транспортиране на задържани; Модификация за SWAT / тактически операции; Модификация за търсене и спасяване; Надзорническа / командна модификация; Модификация за пътен контрол; Само електроника под прикритие; Немаркиран / без външни обозначения; Помощна / поддържаща модификация; Модификация за горски стражари / паркови рейнджъри; Други
vi: Mức độ trang bị bổ sung cho xe cảnh sát: Gói cảnh sát từ nhà máy (tiêu chuẩn truy bắt); Trang bị cho đơn vị K-9; Trang bị tuần tra có nhận diện; Trang bị vận chuyển tù nhân; Trang bị SWAT / chiến thuật; Trang bị tìm kiếm & cứu nạn; Trang bị cho giám sát viên / chỉ huy; Trang bị cho cảnh sát giao thông; Chỉ có thiết bị điện tử ngụy trang; Không nhận diện / không có đánh dấu bên ngoài; Trang bị đa dụng / hỗ trợ hiện trường; Trang bị kiểu kiểm lâm / bảo vệ động vật hoang dã; Khác
th: ระดับการดัดแปลงรถตำรวจ: แพ็กเกจตำรวจจากโรงงาน (มาตรฐานสกัดจับ); ชุดแต่งหน่วย K-9; ชุดแต่งรถสายตรวจมีตราสัญลักษณ์; ชุดแต่งรถขนย้ายผู้ต้องขัง; ชุดแต่งรถ SWAT / ยุทธวิธี; ชุดแต่งรถค้นหาและกู้ภัย; ชุดแต่งรถผู้บังคับบัญชา / สั่งการ; ชุดแต่งรถตำรวจจราจร; สายลับเฉพาะอุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์; ไม่มีตราสัญลักษณ์ / ไม่มีเครื่องหมายภายนอก; ชุดแต่งรถอเนกประสงค์ / สนับสนุนที่เกิดเหตุ; ชุดแต่งสไตล์เจ้าหน้าที่พิทักษ์ป่า / สัตว์ป่า; อื่นๆ
sv: Anpassningsnivå av polisfordon: Fabrikspolispaket (utryckningsgodkänt); Ombyggnad för hundenhet; Ombyggnad för målad patrullbil; Ombyggnad för fångtransport; Insats-/taktisk ombyggnad; Sök- och räddningsombyggnad; Befäls-/ledningsombyggnad; Ombyggnad för trafikövervakning; Endast dold elektronik; Omålad / inga utvändiga markeringar; Ombyggnad för insatsstöd; Ombyggnad i parkvaktarstil; Annat
it: Livello di allestimento dei veicoli delle forze dell'ordine: Pacchetto polizia di fabbrica (idoneo per inseguimenti); Allestimento unità cinofila; Allestimento pattuglia con contrassegni; Allestimento trasporto prigionieri; Allestimento SWAT/tattico; Allestimento ricerca e soccorso; Allestimento supervisore/comando; Allestimento controllo del traffico; Solo elettronica in incognito; Auto civetta/nessun contrassegno esterno; Allestimento utilità/supporto scena; Allestimento stile guardia forestale/parco; Altro
fr: Niveau d’aménagement du véhicule de police: Ensemble police d’usine (homologué pour poursuites); Aménagement unité canine (K-9); Aménagement patrouille identifiée; Aménagement pour transport de prisonniers; Aménagement SWAT / tactique; Aménagement recherche et sauvetage; Aménagement superviseur / poste de commandement; Aménagement contrôle routier; Électronique pour véhicule banalisé uniquement; Banalisé / aucun marquage externe; Aménagement utilitaire / soutien logistique; Aménagement garde-faune / garde-parc; Autre
en: Police vehicle upfit level: Factory police package (pursuit-rated); K-9 unit upfit; Marked patrol upfit; Prisoner transport upfit; SWAT / tactical upfit; Search & rescue upfit; Supervisor / command upfit; Traffic enforcement upfit; Undercover electronics only; Unmarked / no external markings; Utility / scene support upfit; Wildlife / park ranger style upfit; Other
pt-PT: Nível de adaptação das viaturas policiais: Pacote policial de fábrica (classificado para perseguição); Adaptação para unidade K-9; Adaptação para patrulha caracterizada; Adaptação para transporte de prisioneiros; Adaptação SWAT/tática; Adaptação para busca e salvamento; Adaptação para supervisor/comando; Adaptação para controlo de trânsito; Apenas eletrónica oculta; Descaracterizado/sem marcas externas; Adaptação de utilitário/apoio a ocorrências; Adaptação estilo vigilante da natureza/guarda-florestal; Outro
pl: Poziom zabudowy pojazdu policyjnego: Fabryczny pakiet policyjny (pościgowy); Zabudowa dla jednostki K-9; Zabudowa dla oznakowanego patrolu; Zabudowa do transportu więźniów; Zabudowa SWAT / taktyczna; Zabudowa poszukiwawczo-ratownicza; Zabudowa nadzorcza / dowodzenia; Zabudowa do kontroli ruchu drogowego; Tylko ukryta elektronika; Nieoznakowany / brak zewnętrznych oznaczeń; Zabudowa użytkowa / wsparcia na miejscu zdarzenia; Zabudowa w stylu straży leśnej / parku narodowego; Inne
ro-RO: Nivel de echipare al vehiculului de poliție: Pachet poliție de fabrică (certificat pentru urmăriri); Echipare unitate K-9; Echipare patrulă inscripționată; Echipare transport deținuți; Echipare SWAT / tactică; Echipare căutare și salvare; Echipare supervizor / comandă; Echipare poliție rutieră; Doar electronice sub acoperire; Neinscripționat / fără marcaje externe; Echipare utilitară / suport la fața locului; Echipare ranger parcuri / pază forestieră; Altele
zh-CN: 警用车辆改装等级: 原厂警用套件（追捕级）; 警犬单位改装; 有标识巡逻改装; 囚犯运输改装; SWAT / 战术改装; 搜救改装; 主管 / 指挥改装; 交通执法改装; 仅隐蔽电子设备; 无标识 / 无外部标记; 多用途 / 现场支持改装; 野生动物 / 公园护林员风格改装; 其他
da: Politikøretøjets opgraderingsniveau: Fabrikspolitipakke (godkendt til udrykning); Klargøring til hundepatrulje; Klargøring til patruljevogn med bemaling; Klargøring til fangetransport; Klargøring til specialstyrker/taktisk indsats; Klargøring til eftersøgning og redning; Klargøring til indsatsleder; Klargøring til færdselskontrol; Kun skjult elektronik (civil); Civil / ingen eksterne markeringer; Klargøring til støtte/arbejdskøretøj; Klargøring til naturforvalter/skovløber; Andet
fi: Poliisiajoneuvon varustelutaso: Tehtaan poliisipaketti (takaa-ajoluokiteltu); Koirapoliisivarustelu; Tunnuksellinen partiovarustelu; Vankikuljetusvarustelu; SWAT / taktinen varustelu; Etsintä- ja pelastusvarustelu; Esihenkilö- / johtokeskusvarustelu; Liikennevalvontavarustelu; Vain peitetoimintaelektroniikka; Tunnukseton / ei ulkoisia merkintöjä; Hyöty- / tilannepaikkavarustelu; Luonnonvalvoja- / puistonvartijavarustelu; Muu
nb: Oppgraderingsnivå for politibiler: Fabrikkmontert politipakke (utrykningsgodkjent); Ombygging til hundepatrulje; Ombygging til uniformert patruljebil; Ombygging til fangetransport; Ombygging til beredskapstropp / taktisk; Ombygging til søk og redning; Ombygging for innsatsleder/kommandobil; Ombygging for trafikkontroll; Kun skjult elektronikk; Sivil / ingen ytre markeringer; Ombygging til støtte-/innsatsbil; Ombygging til naturoppsyn; Annet
ru: Уровень полицейского оснащения автомобиля: Заводская полицейская комплектация (для преследования); Дооборудование для кинологического подразделения; Дооборудование для патрульной машины с маркировкой; Дооборудование для перевозки задержанных; Дооборудование для спецназа / тактических операций; Дооборудование для поисково-спасательных операций; Дооборудование для руководителя / командного пункта; Дооборудование для контроля дорожного движения; Только скрытая электроника; Без маркировки / без внешних опознавательных знаков; Вспомогательное дооборудование / поддержка на месте происшествия; Дооборудование в стиле лесной охраны / егерей; Другое
tr: Polis aracı donanım seviyesi: Fabrika polis paketi (takip sınıfı); K-9 birimi donanımı; İşaretli devriye donanımı; Mahkum nakil donanımı; SWAT / taktik donanımı; Arama ve kurtarma donanımı; Amir / komuta donanımı; Trafik denetim donanımı; Sadece sivil elektronik donanım; Sivil / dış işaretsiz donanım; Hizmet / olay yeri destek donanımı; Vahşi yaşam / park korucusu stili donanım; Diğer
hr-HR: Razina opremljenosti policijskog vozila: Tvornički policijski paket (odobren za potjere); Nadogradnja za K-9 jedinicu; Nadogradnja za označeno patrolno vozilo; Nadogradnja za prijevoz zatvorenika; SWAT / taktička nadogradnja; Nadogradnja za traganje i spašavanje; Nadzornička / zapovjedna nadogradnja; Nadogradnja za nadzor prometa; Samo prikrivena elektronika; Neoznačeno / bez vanjskih oznaka; Gospodarska nadogradnja / za podršku na terenu; Nadogradnja za rendžere; Ostalo
ja: 警察車両の改造レベル: メーカー製警察用パッケージ (追跡対応); 警察犬部隊用架装; パトロールカー用架装 (マークあり); 護送用架装; SWAT/戦術用架装; 捜索救助用架装; 監督者/指揮用架装; 交通取締り用架装; 潜入捜査用 (電子機器のみ); 覆面用 / 外部マークなし; ユーティリティ/現場支援用架装; 野生動物/パークレンジャースタイル架装; その他
sl-SI: Stopnja opremljenosti policijskega vozila: Tovarniški policijski paket (za zasledovanje); Predelava za enoto K-9; Predelava za označeno patruljo; Predelava za prevoz pripornikov; Predelava za specialne enote (SWAT); Predelava za iskanje in reševanje; Predelava za nadzor in poveljevanje; Predelava za nadzor prometa; Samo skrita elektronika; Neoznačeno / brez zunanjih oznak; Predelava za terensko podporo; Predelava za gozdne/naravovarstvene nadzornike; Drugo
de: Ausstattungsgrad des Polizeifahrzeugs: Werkspolizeipaket (für Verfolgungsjagden zugelassen); Hundestaffel-Ausstattung; Markierte Streifenwagen-Ausstattung; Gefangenentransport-Ausstattung; SWAT-/Taktik-Ausstattung; Such- und Rettungsausstattung; Einsatzleiter-/Kommando-Ausstattung; Verkehrsüberwachungs-Ausstattung; Nur verdeckte Elektronik; Zivilfahrzeug / keine äußeren Markierungen; Nutzfahrzeug-/Tatortunterstützungs-Ausstattung; Wildhüter-/Park-Ranger-Ausstattung; Sonstige
pt-BR: Veículo policial nível de adaptação: Pacote policial de fábrica (adequado para perseguição); Adaptação para unidade K-9; Adaptação para patrulha caracterizada; Adaptação para transporte de prisioneiros; Adaptação para SWAT / tática; Adaptação para busca e resgate; Adaptação para supervisor / comando; Adaptação para fiscalização de trânsito; Apenas eletrônicos para disfarce; Descaracterizado / sem marcações externas; Adaptação para utilitário / apoio de cena; Adaptação para guarda florestal / guarda-parques; Outros
hu: Rendőrségi jármű felépítményezési szintje: Gyári rendőrségi csomag (üldözésre alkalmas); K-9 egység átalakítás; Jelölt járőrautó átalakítás; Fogolyszállító átalakítás; Különleges bevetési (SWAT) átalakítás; Kutató-mentő átalakítás; Parancsnoki/vezetői átalakítás; Közlekedésrendészeti átalakítás; Csak rejtett elektronika; Jelöletlen / nincsenek külső jelzések; Támogató / kiszolgáló átalakítás; Természetvédelmi / parkőr stílusú átalakítás; Egyéb
lt-LT: Policijos transporto priemonės komplektacijos lygis: Gamyklinis policijos paketas (pritaikytas persekiojimui); K-9 padalinio įranga; Žymėto patrulio įranga; Sulaikytųjų transportavimo įranga; SWAT / taktinė įranga; Paieškos ir gelbėjimo įranga; Vadovo / vadovavimo įranga; Eismo priežiūros įranga; Tik slapta elektronika; Nežymėta / be išorinių žymėjimų; Pagalbinė / įvykio vietos įranga; Laukinės gamtos / parko reindžerio stiliaus įranga; Kita
cs: Úroveň vybavení policejního vozidla: Tovární policejní paket (pro stíhání); Úprava pro jednotky K-9; Úprava pro označené hlídkové vozy; Úprava pro přepravu vězňů; Úprava pro SWAT / taktické jednotky; Úprava pro pátrací a záchranné akce; Úprava pro velitele / velení; Úprava pro dopravní policii; Pouze skrytá elektronika; Neoznačené / bez vnějšího označení; Úprava pro užitková vozidla / technickou podporu; Úprava pro strážce parku / ochranu přírody; Jiné
nl: Politievoertuig ombouwniveau: Fabriekspakket politie (achtervolgingsgeschikt); Aanpassing K9-eenheid; Aanpassing gemarkeerde patrouille; Aanpassing arrestantenvervoer; Aanpassing SWAT/tactisch; Aanpassing search & rescue; Aanpassing leidinggevende/commando; Aanpassing verkeershandhaving; Alleen undercover-elektronica; Ongemarkeerd/geen externe markeringen; Aanpassing utiliteit/plaats delict-ondersteuning; Aanpassing boswachter/parkwachter; Overig
es: Nivel de equipamiento de vehículos policiales: Paquete policial de fábrica (clasificado para persecuciones); Acondicionamiento para unidad K-9; Acondicionamiento para patrulla rotulada; Acondicionamiento para transporte de prisioneros; Acondicionamiento SWAT / táctico; Acondicionamiento de búsqueda y rescate; Acondicionamiento para supervisor / mando; Acondicionamiento para control de tráfico; Solo electrónica encubierta; Sin rotular / sin marcas externas; Acondicionamiento de utilidad / apoyo en la escena; Acondicionamiento estilo guardaparques / vida silvestre; Otro